Utah statutes.
46-1-10.   Testimonials prohibited.

A notary may not endorse or promote any product, service, contest, or other offering if the notary's title or seal is used in the endorsement or promotional statement.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 287, 1998 General Session

